Tennessee, session 114, SB1871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-1106, is amended by
redesignating subsections (a) and (b) as subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) and by adding the
following new subsection (b):
(b) The commissioner of general services may commission the director of a
training academy that falls under the commissioner's general supervision as a law
enforcement officer. The commissioner may commission any staff member of a training
academy that falls under the commissioner's general supervision as a law enforcement
officer upon receiving a written recommendation for the staff member from the director.
A person who is commissioned pursuant to this subsection (b) must comply with § 8-8-
101 and be sworn in pursuant to § 8-18-111.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 11, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
4-3-1108.
(a) The department of general services may operate a sales facility at a law
enforcement training academy that is under the general supervision of the commissioner
of general services.
(b) The department may assess and collect reasonable fees for services,
programs, lodging, food, facility usage, instructional materials, equipment, and other
functions provided in connection with the operation of a law enforcement training
SB1871
010035
- 1 -

academy that is under the general supervision of the commissioner of general services.
All fees collected must be deposited into a designated fund and used exclusively for the
administration, maintenance, and enhancement of such training academy.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-203, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) The academy may sell goods that support the educational and operational
needs of the academy and promotional items.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010035